Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska81-1412.01
Handgun qualification test.

The minimum handgun qualification test shall consist of a handgun shooting course requiring the firing of fifty rounds of ammunition for completion of the course and the handgun shooting course prescribed target shall be the Federal Bureau of Investigation's "Q" target. The target shall be fired upon at a distance or at distances prescribed by the council. The method of scoring on the handgun shooting course shall be "pass/fail". "Pass" means a score of seventy percent or higher. A law enforcement officer participating in the minimum handgun qualification test shall use a handgun of the same make and model as the handgun which he or she will be authorized to use while on duty. The council shall adopt and promulgate rules and regulations governing the handguns to be used in the handgun qualification when a law enforcement officer is not authorized to use a handgun on duty.

Laws 1996, LB 1055, § 14;

Laws 1999, LB 205, § 3.